Tennessee, session 114, SB2428.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 7, Chapter 51, is amended by adding
the following as a new part:
7-51-2801.
As used in this part, "local governmental entity" means a governing body, board,
commission, committee, department, or law enforcement agency of a municipality,
county, or other political subdivision of this state.
7-51-2802.
(a) When a local governmental entity extends invitations to interview candidates,
whether for appointment or promotion, and the pool of candidates includes a person who
has been honorably discharged from the army, navy, air force, marine corps, space
force, or coast guard, or a member of the reserve components, as defined in 10 U.S.C. §
10101, who performs active federal service in the armed forces of the United States, the
local governmental entity shall invite these persons to interview.
(b) If a veteran is in the pool of candidates and meets the minimum qualifications
for the position, and the skills, abilities, competencies, and knowledge of the veteran and
another applicant being interviewed for the position are equal, preference must be given
to the veteran for the position.
(c) When a local governmental entity extends invitations to interview candidates,
whether for appointment or promotion, the local governmental entity shall invite the
SB2428
012147
- 1 -

spouse or surviving spouse of a veteran to interview, if the spouse or surviving spouse is
a qualified voter in this state or has been a resident of this state for two (2) years
preceding such person's application, and one (1) of the two (2) following circumstances
exists:
(1) As a result of such military service, the veteran suffered a one
hundred percent (100%) service-connected disability or is permanently and
totally disabled; or
(2)
(A) The veteran died in the line of duty during such military
service; and
(B) The surviving spouse has not remarried since the death of the
veteran.
(d) A local governmental entity that passes over an eligible veteran and selects
an eligible nonveteran shall file with the commissioner of veterans services, within thirty
(30) days, the reasons for so doing, which reasons will become a part of the veteran's
record, but will not be made available to anyone other than the veteran.
(e) An application form used by a local governmental entity must include the
option for the applicant to declare veteran status.
(f) This section is in addition to, and does not supersede, any federal laws or
rules regarding the hiring of veterans.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 8-30-307, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection:
(e) An application form used by an appointing authority must include the option
for the applicant to declare veteran status.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 012147